Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.64.011

Application—Requirements—Application of chapter.

An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were cast in a primary who did not qualify for the general election may file a written application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that primary for all persons for whom votes were cast for that office.

An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were cast at any election may file a written application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that election for all candidates for election to that office.

Any group of five or more registered voters may file a written application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast upon any question or issue. They shall designate one of the members of the group as chair and shall indicate the voting residence of each member of the group.

An application for a recount of the votes cast for an office or on a ballot measure must be filed with the officer with whom filings are made for the jurisdiction.

An application for a recount must specify whether the recount will be done manually or by the vote tally system. A recount done by the vote tally system must use programming that recounts and reports only the office or ballot measure in question. The county shall also provide for a test of the logic and accuracy of that program.

An application for a recount must be filed within two business days after the county canvassing board or secretary of state has declared the official results of the primary or election for the office or issue for which the recount is requested.

This chapter applies to the recounting of votes cast by paper ballots and to the recounting of votes recorded on ballots counted by a vote tally system.

[ 2011 c 349 s 23; 2004 c 271 s 177.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.